Utah statutes.
34A-2-113.   Designated agent required.
Each workers' compensation insurance carrier writing insurance in this state
shall maintain a designated agent in this state that is:
(1)   registered with the division; and
(2)  authorized to receive on behalf of the workers' compensation insurance
carrier all notices or orders provided for under this chapter or Chapter 3,
Utah Occupational Disease Act.
